North Dakota, session 69, HB1296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 62.1-04-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
62.1-04-04. Producing license upon request - Penalty.
1. EveryAn individual while carrying a concealed firearm or dangerous weapon, for which
a license to carry concealed is required, shall have on one'sthe individual's person the
license issued by this or another state or a digital image of one'sthe individual's
concealed firearm or dangerous weapon license issued by this state on an electronic
device and shall give itthe license or digital image of the license to any activea law
enforcement officer for an inspection upon request by the officer. The failure of anyan
individual to give the license or digital image of the license to the officer is prima facie
evidence the individual is illegally carrying a firearm or dangerous weapon concealed.
2. EveryAn individual carrying a concealed firearm under the authority granted in
subsection 2 of section 62.1-04-02 shall inform a law enforcement officer of the
individual's possession of a concealed weapon upon the initiation of a traffic stop or
any other in-person contact initiated by a law enforcementfirearm if the officer inquires
about the individual possessing a concealed firearm.
3. EveryAn individual carrying a concealed firearm under the authority granted in
subsection 2 of section 62.1-04-02 shall have on one'sthe individual's person a valid
driver's license or nondriver identification card issued by the department of
Page No. 1 25.0236.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
transportation or by the individual's state or territory of residence, or a digital image of
one'sthe individual's valid driver's license or nondriver identification card on a mobile
device and shall provide the license or card to anya law enforcement officer for
inspection upon request by the officer.
4. An individual who violates this section is guilty of a noncriminal offense punishable by
a fee of twenty dollars.
Page No. 2 25.0236.01000